California statutes. Penal Code
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Criminal Justice Realignment Evaluation [13400. - 13400.]

13400.

(a) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall prepare a report, to be submitted to the Legislature on June 30, 2026, evaluating the results of Assembly Bill 109 of the 2011–12 Regular Session over the previous 10 years, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The amount of funding received per county and how that funding was allocated, including, but not limited to, the following categories:

(A) Funding received by department or agency.

(B) All types of facilities construction.

(C) The number and type of additional personnel.

(D) Rehabilitative programming.

(E) Any other services.

(2) Information on sentencing practices, including the use of straight sentencing, split sentencing, probation, diversion, and any other alternatives to custody.

(3) The impact on the county jail population as based on changes to the average monthly jail population, whether there were changes in jail release policies, and whether the county jail was under any court-ordered population cap.

(4) Information on postrelease community supervision practices, including caseload of probation officers, responses to supervision violations, including describing the sanctions used and particularly the use of flash incarceration, and programming and services offered.

(5) Recidivism outcomes, as defined by rearrest and reconviction rates after release from custody for offenders sentenced under subdivision (h) of Section 1170, and those released on postrelease community supervision.

(b) The report may be based on data from every county, or alternatively, a multicounty study using data from at least 15
 counties representative of the state.

(c) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this chapter is repealed on
 June 30, 2030.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of June 30, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 2.5, commencing with Sec. 13400, consisting of this section.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 4. STANDARDS AND TRAINING OF LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS [13500. - 13553.]



  CHAPTER 1. Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training [13500. - 13553.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [13500. - 13509.6.]

13500.

(a) There is in the Department of Justice a Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, hereafter referred to in this chapter as the commission. The commission consists of 15 members appointed by the Governor, after consultation with, and with the advice of, the Attorney General and with the advice and consent of the Senate. Racial, gender, and ethnic diversity shall be considered for all appointments to the commission.

(b) The commission shall be composed of the following members:

(1) Two members shall be (i) sheriffs or chiefs of police or peace officers nominated by their respective sheriffs
 or chiefs of police, (ii) peace officers who are deputy sheriffs or city police officers, or (iii) a combination thereof.

(2) Three members shall be sheriffs, chiefs of police, or peace officers nominated by their respective sheriffs or chiefs of police.

(3) Four members shall be peace officers of the rank of sergeant or below with a minimum of five years’ experience as a deputy sheriff, city police officer, marshal, or state-employed peace officer for whom the commission sets standards. Each member shall have demonstrated leadership in the recognized employee organization having the right to represent the member, as set forth in the Meyers-Milias-Brown Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500)) and Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 3525) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the
 Government Code.

(4) One member shall be an elected officer or chief administrative officer of a county in this state.

(5) One member shall be an elected officer or chief administrative officer of a city in this state.

(6) Two members shall be public members who shall not be peace officers.

(7) One member shall be an educator or trainer in the field of criminal justice.

(8) One member shall be a peace officer in California of the rank of sergeant or below with a minimum of five years experience as a deputy sheriff, city police officer, marshal, or state-employed peace officer for whom the
 commission sets standards. This member shall have demonstrated leadership in a California-based law enforcement association that is also a presenter of POST-certified law enforcement training that advances the professionalism of peace officers in California.

(c) In addition to the members of the commission appointed pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b), the President pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a commission member who is not a peace officer. The two appointees shall each have demonstrated expertise in one or more of the following areas:

(1) Implicit and explicit bias.

(2) Cultural competency.

(3) Mental
 health and policing.

(4) Work with vulnerable populations, including, but not limited to, children, elderly persons, people who are pregnant, and people with physical, mental, and developmental disabilities.

(d) The Attorney General shall be an ex officio member of the commission.

(e) All members of the commission shall serve for a term of three years and until appointment and qualification of their successors, each term to commence on the expiration date of the term of the predecessor.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission is authorized to inspect and duplicate any criminal history information, criminal offender record information, or criminal
 justice information, including information contained in or derived from the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System, or any other sensitive, confidential or privileged information if the commission determines that the information is needed in the course of the commission’s duties.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting subdivision (f) to recognize that the commission is considered a criminal justice agency under Section 13101 and may have access to information derived from criminal justice databases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 32, Sec. 2.   (AB 354)   Effective July 14, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13501.

The Governor shall designate the chair of the commission from among the members of the commission. The person designated as the chair shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The commission shall annually select a vice chair from among its members. A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 35.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13502.

Members of the commission shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. For purposes of compensation, attendance at meetings of the commission shall be deemed performance by a member of the duties of his local governmental employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1823.)
-------------------------------------------

13503.

In carrying out its duties and responsibilities, the commission shall have all of the following powers:

(a) To meet at those times and places as it may deem proper.

(b) To employ an executive secretary and, pursuant to civil service, those clerical and technical assistants as may be necessary.

(c) To contract with other agencies, public or private, or persons as it deems necessary, for the rendition and affording of those services, facilities, studies, and reports to the commission as will best assist it to carry out its duties and responsibilities.

(d) To cooperate with and to secure the cooperation of county, city, city and county, and other local law enforcement agencies in investigating any matter within the scope of its duties and responsibilities, and in performing its other functions.

(e) To develop and implement programs to increase the effectiveness of law enforcement and when those programs involve training and education courses to cooperate with and secure the cooperation of state-level peace officers, agencies, and bodies having jurisdiction over systems of public higher education in continuing the development of college-level training and education programs.

(f) To investigate and determine the fitness of any person to serve as a peace officer
 within the Peace Officer Standards and Training program or as defined in Section 13510.1 in the State of California. 

(g) To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of every department, agency, or instrumentality in the state government.

(h) To audit any law enforcement agency that employs peace officers described in subdivision (a) of Section 13510.1, without cause and at any time. 

(i) To do any and all things necessary or convenient to enable it fully and adequately to perform its duties and to exercise the power granted to it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 409, Sec. 6.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13503.1.

(a) Commission employees, prospective employees, appointees, volunteers, contractors, and subcontractors, whose job duties require access to criminal offender record information as defined in Section 13102, state summary criminal history information as defined in Section 11105, or information obtained from the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System, shall undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) The commission shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background
 check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105. The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal level response pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 11105.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 32, Sec. 3.   (AB 354)   Effective July 14, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13503.5.

(a) Commencing February 1, 2020, and each year thereafter, the commission shall submit an annual report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the overall effectiveness of any additional funding appropriated by the Legislature on or after July 1, 2019, in improving peace officer training. For the purpose of this section, “additional funding” does not include General Fund resources provided to backfill declines in non-General Fund revenue in the 2019 Budget Act.

(b) At minimum, the reporting described in subdivision (a) shall include both of the following:

(1) The number of peace officers trained by law enforcement agency, by course, and by
 how training was delivered.

(2) The training provided and the descriptions of the training, including the duration of the training and the skills addressed in the training.

(c) To the extent that information required in subdivision (b) is not yet available for a particular annual report, the commission shall report on how it plans to measure and report that information in the future. The commission also shall specify the date by which it anticipates that the information will be available for reporting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 25, Sec. 45.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13504.

The Attorney General shall, so far as compatible with other demands upon the personnel in the Department of Justice, make available to the commission the services of such personnel to assist the commission in the execution of the duties imposed upon it by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1823.)
-------------------------------------------

13505.

In exercising its functions, the commission shall endeavor to minimize costs of administration so that a maximum of funds will be expended for the purpose of providing training and other services to local law enforcement agencies. All expenses shall be a proper charge against the revenue accruing under Article 3 (commencing with Section 13520).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

13506.

The commission may adopt those regulations as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 409, Sec. 7.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13507.

As used in this chapter, “district” means any of the following:

(a) A regional park district.

(b) A district authorized by statute to maintain a police department.

(c) The University of California.

(d) The California State University and Colleges.

(e) A community college district.

(f) A school district.

(g) A transit district.

(h) A harbor district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 950, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13507.1.

As used in this chapter, “joint powers agency” means any agency, entity, or authority formed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 59, Sec. 8.   (SB 514)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13508.

(a) The commission shall do each of the following:

(1) Establish a learning technology laboratory that would conduct pilot projects with regard to needed facilities and otherwise implement modern instructional technology to improve the effectiveness of law enforcement training.

(2) Develop an implementation plan for the acquisition of law enforcement facilities and technology. In developing this plan, the commission shall consult with appropriate law enforcement and training organizations. The implementation plan shall include each of the following items:

(A) An evaluation of pilot and demonstration projects. 

(B) Recommendations for the establishment of regional skills training centers, training conference centers, and the use of modern instructional technology. 

(C) A recommended financing structure. 

(b) The commission may enter into joint powers agreements with other governmental agencies for the purpose of developing and deploying needed technology and facilities. 

(c) Any pilot project conducted pursuant to this section shall terminate on or before January 1, 1995, unless funding is provided for the project continuation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 155.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

13509.5.

(a) There is within the commission a Peace Officer Standards Accountability Division, hereafter referred to in this chapter as the division.

(b) The primary responsibilities of the division shall be to review investigations conducted by law enforcement agencies or any other investigative authority and to conduct additional investigations, as necessary, into serious misconduct that may provide grounds for suspension or revocation of a peace officer’s certification, present findings and recommendations to the board and commission, and bring proceedings seeking the suspension or revocation of certification of peace officers as directed by the board and commission
 pursuant to this chapter. 

(c) The division shall be staffed with a sufficient number of experienced and able employees that are capable of handling the most complex and varied types of decertification investigations, prosecutions, and administrative proceedings against peace officers. 

(d) The commission shall establish procedures for accepting complaints from members of the public regarding peace officers or law enforcement agencies that may be investigated by the division or referred to the peace officers’ employing agency or the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 409, Sec. 8.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13509.6.

(a) No later than January 1, 2023, the Governor shall establish the Peace Officer Standards Accountability Advisory Board, hereafter referred to in this chapter as the board. 

(b) The purpose of the board shall be to make recommendations on the decertification of peace officers to the commission. 

(c) The protection of the public and all constitutional and statutory rights shall be the highest priority for the board as it
 upholds the standards for peace officers in California.

(d) The board shall consist of nine members, as follows: 

(1) One member shall be a peace officer or former peace officer with substantial experience at a command rank, appointed by the Governor. 

(2) One member shall be a peace officer or former peace officer with substantial experience at a management rank in internal investigations or disciplinary proceedings of peace officers, appointed by the Governor. 

(3) Two members shall be members of the public, who shall not be former peace officers, who have substantial experience working at nonprofit or academic institutions on issues related to police
 accountability. One of these members shall be appointed by the Governor and one by the Speaker of the Assembly. 

(4) Two members shall be members of the public, who shall not be former peace officers, who have substantial experience working at community-based organizations on issues related to police accountability. One of these members shall be appointed by the Governor and one by the Senate Rules Committee. 

(5) Two members shall be members of the public, who shall not be former peace officers, with strong consideration given to individuals who have been subject to wrongful use of force likely to cause death or serious bodily injury by a peace officer, or who are surviving family members of a
 person killed by the wrongful use of deadly force by a peace officer, appointed by the Governor. 

(6) One member shall be an attorney, who shall not be a former peace officer, with substantial professional experience involving oversight of peace officers, appointed by the Governor. 

(e) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f), each member shall be appointed for a term of three years and shall hold office until the appointment of the member’s successor or until one year has elapsed since the expiration of the term for which the member was appointed, whichever occurs first. Vacancies occurring shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term of a person with the same qualification for appointment as the person being replaced. No person shall serve more than two
 terms consecutively. The Governor shall remove from the board any peace officer member whose certification as a peace officer has been revoked. The Governor may, after hearing, remove any member of the board for neglect of duty or other just cause. 

(f) Of the members initially appointed to the board, three shall be appointed for a term of one year, three for a term of two years, and three for a term of three years. Successor appointments shall be made pursuant to subdivision (e). 

(g) The Governor shall designate the chair of the board from among the members of the board. The person designated as the chair shall serve as chair of the board at the pleasure of the Governor. The board shall annually select a vice chair from among its members. A majority of the members of the board
 shall constitute a quorum.

(h) Each member of the board shall receive a per diem of three hundred fifty dollars ($350) for each day actually spent in the discharge of official duties, including any required training and reasonable time spent in preparation for public hearings, and shall be reimbursed for travel and other expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of official duties. Upon request of a member based on financial necessity, the commission shall arrange and make direct payment for travel or other necessities rather than providing reimbursement. 

(i) All members of the board shall complete a 40-hour decertification training course, as developed by the commission, which shall include, but not be limited to, subjects regarding the decertification process,
 internal investigations, evidentiary standards, use of force standards and training, and local disciplinary processes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 409, Sec. 9.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Field Services, Standards, and Certification [13510. - 13519.15.]

13510.

(a) (1) For the purpose of raising the level of competence of local law enforcement officers, the commission shall adopt, and may from time to time amend, rules establishing and upholding minimum standards relating to physical, mental, and moral fitness that shall govern the recruitment of any city police officers, peace officer members of a county sheriff’s office, marshals or deputy marshals, peace officer members of a county coroner’s office notwithstanding Section 13526, reserve officers, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 830.6, police officers of a district authorized by statute to maintain a police department, peace officer members of a police department operated by a joint powers agency established by Article 1
 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, regularly employed and paid inspectors and investigators of a district attorney’s office, as defined in Section 830.1, who conduct criminal investigations, peace officer members of a district, safety police officers and park rangers of the County of Los Angeles, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.31, or housing authority police departments.

(2) The commission also shall adopt, and may from time to time amend, rules establishing minimum standards for training of city police officers, peace officer members of county sheriff’s offices, marshals or deputy marshals, peace officer members of a county coroner’s office notwithstanding Section 13526, reserve officers, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 830.6, police officers of a district
 authorized by statute to maintain a police department, peace officer members of a police department operated by a joint powers agency established by Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, regularly employed and paid inspectors and investigators of a district attorney’s office, as defined in Section 830.1, who conduct criminal investigations, peace officer members of a district, safety police officers and park rangers of the County of Los Angeles, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.31, and housing authority police departments.

(3) These rules shall apply to those cities, counties, cities and counties, and districts receiving state aid pursuant to this chapter and shall be adopted and amended pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part
 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The commission shall conduct research concerning job-related educational standards and job-related selection standards to include vision, hearing, physical ability, and emotional stability. Job-related standards that are supported by this research shall be adopted by the commission prior to January 1, 1985, and shall apply to those peace officer classes identified in subdivision (a). The commission shall consult with local entities during the conducting of related research into job-related selection standards.

(c) For the purpose of raising the level of competence of local public safety dispatchers, the commission shall adopt, and may from time to time amend, rules establishing minimum standards relating to the recruitment and
 training of local public safety dispatchers having a primary responsibility for providing dispatching services for local law enforcement agencies described in subdivision (a), which standards shall apply to those cities, counties, cities and counties, and districts receiving state aid pursuant to this chapter. These standards also shall apply to consolidated dispatch centers operated by an independent public joint powers agency established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code when providing dispatch services to the law enforcement personnel listed in subdivision (a). Those rules shall be adopted and amended pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. As used in this section, “primary responsibility” refers to the performance of law enforcement
 dispatching duties for a minimum of 50 percent of the time worked within a pay period.

(d) This section does not prohibit a local agency from establishing selection and training standards that exceed the minimum standards established by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 409, Sec. 11.   (SB 2)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13510.06.

Notwithstanding any other law, information that identifies the testing results of a particular student of a regular basic course of peace officer training is confidential and shall not be released to the public unless otherwise subject to disclosure
 under Section 832.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 172, Sec. 2.   (AB 332)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13510.1.

(a) The commission shall establish a certification program for peace officers described in Section 830.1, 830.2 with the exception of those described in subdivision (d) of that section, 830.3, 830.32, or 830.33, or any other peace officer employed by an agency that participates in the Peace Officer Standards and Training (POST) program. A certificate or proof of eligibility issued pursuant to this section shall be considered the property of the commission.

(b) Basic, intermediate, advanced, supervisory, management, and executive certificates shall be established for the purpose of fostering professionalization, education, and experience necessary to adequately accomplish the general
 police service duties performed by peace officer members of city police departments, county sheriffs’ departments, districts, university and state university and college departments, or by the California Highway Patrol.

(c) (1) Certificates shall be awarded on the basis of a combination of training, education, experience, and other prerequisites, as determined by the commission.

(2) In determining whether an applicant for certification has the requisite education, the commission shall recognize as acceptable college education only the following:

(A) Education provided by a community college, college, or university that has been accredited by the department of education of the state in which
 the community college, college, or university is located or by a recognized national or regional accrediting body.

(B) Until January 1, 1998, educational courses or degrees provided by a nonaccredited but state-approved college that offers programs exclusively in criminal justice.

(d) Persons who are determined by the commission to be eligible peace officers may make application for the certificates, provided they are employed by an agency that participates in the POST program. Any agency appointing an individual who does not already have a basic certificate as described in subdivision (a) and who is not eligible for a certificate shall make application for proof of eligibility within 10 days of appointment.

(e) The
 commission shall assign each person who applies for or receives certification a unique identifier that shall be used to track certification status from application for certification through that person’s career as a peace officer.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission shall have the authority to suspend, revoke, or cancel any certification pursuant to this chapter. This authority extends to any certificate or proof of eligibility issued by the commission including, without limitation, any certificate or proof of eligibility that is invalid, inactive, expired, or canceled.

(g) (1) An agency that employs peace officers described in subdivision (a) shall employ as a peace officer only individuals with current, valid certification pursuant to this section, except that an agency may provisionally employ a person for up to 24 months, pending certification by the commission, provided that the person has received a proof of eligibility and has not previously been certified or denied certification or had their certification revoked.

(2) In accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 832.4, deputy sheriffs described in subdivision (c) of Section 830.1 shall obtain valid certification pursuant to this section upon reassignment from custodial duties to general law enforcement duties.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), the commission shall issue a basic certificate or proof of eligibility to any peace officer described in subdivision (a) who, on January 1, 2022, is eligible for a basic certificate or proof of eligibility but has not applied for a certification.

(2) Commencing on January 1, 2023, any peace officer described in subdivision (a) who does not possess a basic certificate and who is not yet or will not be eligible for a basic certificate, shall apply to the commission for proof of eligibility.

(i) As used in this chapter, “certification” means any and all valid and unexpired certificates issued pursuant to subdivision (b), including basic, intermediate, advanced, supervisory, management, and executive certificates or
 any proof of eligibility issued by the commission pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 397, Sec. 1.   (SB 449)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13510.2.

Any person who knowingly commits any of the following acts is guilty of a misdemeanor, and for each offense is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or by both a fine and imprisonment:

(a) Presents or attempts to present as the person’s own the certificate of another.

(b) Knowingly permits another to use his or her certificate.

(c) Knowingly gives false evidence of any material kind to the commission, or to any member thereof, including the staff, in obtaining a certificate.

(d) Uses, or attempts to use, a canceled certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 43, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13510.3.

(a) The commission shall establish, by December 31, 1997, and in consultation with representatives of law enforcement organizations, a voluntary professional certification program for law enforcement records supervisors who have primary responsibility for providing records supervising services for local law enforcement agencies. The certificate or certificates shall be based upon standards related to the education, training, and experience of law enforcement records supervisors and shall serve to foster professionalism and recognition of achievement and competency.

(b) As used in this section, “primary responsibility” refers to the performance of law enforcement records supervising duties for a minimum of 50 percent of the time worked within a pay period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13510.4.

(a) A peace officer trainee who, based on the commission’s investigative findings, knowingly cheats, assists in cheating, or aids, abets, or knowingly conceals efforts by others to cheat in any manner on a basic course examination mandated by the commission shall be liable for a civil fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per occurrence.

(b) For purposes of this section, “cheating” means any attempt or act by a peace officer trainee to gain an unfair advantage or give an unfair advantage to another peace officer trainee or group of trainees taking a POST-mandated basic course examination.

(c) For purposes of this section,
 “peace officer trainee” means an applicant for a basic course examination who has not been hired by a department or agency and who has not been sworn as a peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 372, Sec. 1.   (AB 2285)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

13510.5.

For the purpose of maintaining the level of competence of state law enforcement officers, the commission shall adopt, and may, from time to time amend, rules establishing minimum standards for training of peace officers as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, who are employed by any railroad company, the University of California police department, a California State University police department, the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, the Division of Investigation of the Department of Consumer Affairs, the Wildlife Protection Branch of the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, including the Office of the State Fire Marshal, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the California Horse Racing Board, the Food and Drug Section of
 the State Department of Public Health, the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, the Director of Parks and Recreation, the State Department of Health Care Services, the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of State Hospitals, the State Department of Developmental Services, the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, and the Department of Justice. All rules shall be adopted and amended pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 408.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13510.6.

(a) The commission shall establish a definition of “biased conduct” that, at a minimum, includes all of the following:

(1) Biased conduct includes any conduct, including, but not limited to, conduct online, such as social media use, engaged in by a peace officer in any encounter with the public, first responders, or employees of criminal justice agencies, as defined in Section 13101, motivated by bias toward any person’s protected class or
 characteristic, whether actual or
 perceived, that is described in subdivision (b) of Section 51 of the Civil Code.

(2) Biased conduct may result from implicit and explicit biases.

(3) Conduct is biased if a reasonable person with the same training and experience would conclude, based upon the facts, that the officer’s conduct resulted from bias towards that person’s membership in a protected class described in paragraph (1).

(4) An officer need not admit biased or prejudiced intent for conduct to be determined to be biased conduct.

(b) When investigating any bias-related complaint or incident that involves possible indications of officer bias, a law enforcement agency shall determine whether the conduct being investigated constitutes “biased conduct,” using the definition developed by the commission in accordance with subdivision (a).

(c) The commission shall develop guidance for local law enforcement departments on performing effective internet and social media screenings of officer applicants. The guidance shall include, at minimum, strategies for identifying applicant social media profiles and for searching for, and identifying, content indicative
 of potential biases, such as affiliation with hate groups.

(d) In the investigation of any complaint involving any law enforcement activity described in subdivision (e) of Section 13519.4, the investigating law enforcement agency shall determine if racial profiling, as defined in that section, occurred.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 443)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13510.7.

(a) Whenever any person holding a certificate issued pursuant to Section 13510.1 is determined to be disqualified from holding office or being employed as a peace officer for the reasons set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 1029 of the Government Code, the commission shall cause the following to be entered in the commission’s training record for that person: “THIS PERSON IS INELIGIBLE TO BE A PEACE OFFICER IN CALIFORNIA PURSUANT TO GOVERNMENT CODE SECTION 1029(a).”

(b) Whenever any person who is required to possess a basic certificate issued by the commission pursuant to Section 832.4 or who is subject to subdivision (a) of Section 13510.1 is determined to be disqualified
 from holding office or being employed as a peace officer for the reasons set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 1029 of the Government Code, the commission shall notify the law enforcement agency that employs the person that the person is ineligible to be a peace officer in California pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1029 of the Government Code.

(c) After the time for filing a notice of appeal has passed, or where the remittitur has been issued following the filing of a notice of appeal, in a criminal case establishing the ineligibility of a person to be a peace officer as specified in subdivision (b), or in the event a conviction of the offense requiring or accompanying ineligibility is subsequently overturned or reversed by the action of a court of competent jurisdiction, the person shall notify the commission in writing and provide
 documentation of the court’s action.

(d) Upon written request of a person who is eligible for reinstatement pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1029 of the Government Code because of successful completion of probation pursuant to Section 1210.1 of the Penal Code, and who has provided court documentation that he or she has had eligibility restored, the commission shall remove the notation “THIS PERSON IS INELIGIBLE TO BE A PEACE OFFICER IN CALIFORNIA PURSUANT TO GOVERNMENT CODE SECTION 1029(a)” in the commission’s training record for that person. The removal of this notation of ineligibility in the person’s training record shall not create a mandate that the person be hired by any agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 105.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13510.8.

(a) (1) The commission shall revoke the certification of a certified peace officer if the person is or has become ineligible to hold office as a peace officer pursuant to Section 1029 of the Government Code.

(2) The commission may suspend or revoke the certification of a peace officer if the person has been terminated for cause from employment as a peace officer for, or has, while employed as a peace officer, otherwise engaged in, any serious misconduct as described in subdivision (b).

(3) The commission may cancel the certificate or proof of eligibility of a peace officer if the commission determines
 that there was fraud or misrepresentation made by an applicant at any time during the application process that resulted in the issuance of the certification.

(b) By January 1, 2023, the commission shall adopt by regulation a definition of “serious misconduct” that shall serve as the criteria to be considered for ineligibility for, or revocation of, certification. This definition shall include all of the following:
